Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-405.05
City or village in two or more counties; annexation by city or village; procedure.

When any city of the second class or village situated in two or more counties shall desire to annex to its corporate limits any contiguous territory, whether within the counties within which such city or village is situated or otherwise, such territory may be annexed in the manner provided by sections 17-405.01 to 17-405.04.

Laws 1903, c. 23, § 2, p. 259;

R.S.1913, § 5089;

C.S.1922, § 4262;

C.S.1929, § 17-411;

R.S.1943, § 17-413;

Laws 1967, c. 74, § 5, p. 241;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 17-413;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 114.

A village located upon the border of one county may annex contiguous territory situated in an adjacent county, though such village has the burden of proving that the territory annexed will be benefited or that justice and equity require that the territory be annexed. Village of Wakefield v. Utecht, 90 Neb. 252, 133 N.W. 240 (1911).